California statutes. Probate Code
(c) (1) A person who provides consent for another person pursuant to this section shall do so in writing.

(2) The consent of a person who may represent and bind another person pursuant to this section is binding on the represented person unless the represented person objects to the representation before the consent would have become effective.

(3) A fiduciary who acts in reliance upon a representation made pursuant to this section shall not be liable for any resulting loss, unless the fiduciary committed a breach of trust intentionally, with gross negligence, in bad faith, or with reckless indifference to the interests of a beneficiary.

(d) An action taken by the court under this division is conclusive and binding upon a person represented pursuant to this section.

(e) The following representation is
 permissible:

(1) A parent may represent and bind the parent’s minor children and children subsequently born if a guardian or guardian ad litem for the child or children has not been appointed.

(2) A conservator of the estate may represent and bind the conservatee.

(3) A guardian of the estate may represent and bind the minor ward.

(4) A guardian ad litem with authority to act with respect to the matter may represent and bind the ward.

(5) An agent with authority to act with respect to the matter may represent and bind the principal.

(6) A trustee may represent and bind the beneficiaries of the trust.

(7) A personal representative may represent and bind persons interested in the estate.

(f) Unless otherwise represented, a minor, an incapacitated person, a person subsequently born, or a person whose identity or location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable may be represented by and bound by another person having a substantially identical interest with respect to the particular question or dispute.

(g) The following representation of successive interests is permissible:

(1) If an interest has been given to persons who
 comprise a certain class upon the happening of a future event, the living persons who would constitute the class as of the date the representation is to be determined may represent and bind all other members of the class as of that date.

(2) If an interest has been given to a living person or to a class of persons, and a substantially identical interest is to pass to another person or class of persons, or both, upon the happening of a future event, the living person or the living members of the class of persons who hold the interest may represent and bind all of the persons and classes of persons who might take on the happening of all future events.

(3) If an interest will be given to a living person or to a class of persons upon the happening of a future event and a
 substantially identical interest would pass to another person or class of persons, or both, upon the happening of one or more future events, the living person or the living members of the class of persons who will hold the interest on the happening of an earlier event may represent and bind all of the persons and classes of persons who might take on the happening of all future events.

(h) The holder of a lifetime or testamentary power of appointment may represent and bind persons who are permissible appointees or takers in default of that exercise.

(i) This section does not affect any of the following:

(1) Requirements for notice in a court proceeding to any of the following:

(A) A person who has requested special notice.

(B) A person who has filed notice of appearance.

(C) A particular person or entity required by statute to be given notice.

(2) Availability of a guardian ad litem pursuant to Section 1003.

(3) A representative’s previously existing duties.

(j) For purposes of this
 section, “notice” includes other papers.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 39, Sec. 2.   (AB 565)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15805.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Attorney General is subject to the limitations on the rights of beneficiaries of revocable trusts provided by Sections 15800 to 15802, inclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. TRUST ADMINISTRATION [16000. - 16632.]



  CHAPTER 1. Duties of Trustees [16000. - 16110.]



  ARTICLE 1. Trustee’s Duties in General [16000. - 16015.]

16000.

On acceptance of the trust, the trustee has a duty to administer the trust according to the trust instrument and, except to the extent the trust instrument provides otherwise, according to this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16001.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the trustee of a revocable trust shall follow any written direction acceptable to the trustee given from time to time (1) by the person then having the power to revoke the trust or the part thereof with respect to which the direction is given or (2) by the person to whom the settlor delegates the right to direct the trustee.

(b) If a written direction given under subdivision (a) would have the effect of modifying the trust, the trustee has no duty to follow the direction unless it complies with the requirements for modifying the trust.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16002.

(a) The trustee has a duty to administer the trust solely in the interest of the beneficiaries.

(b) It is not a violation of the duty provided in subdivision (a) for a trustee who administers two trusts to sell, exchange, or participate in the sale or exchange of trust property between the trusts, if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The sale or exchange is fair and reasonable with respect to the beneficiaries of both trusts.

(2) The trustee gives to the beneficiaries of both trusts notice of all material facts related to the sale or exchange that the trustee knows or should know.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16003.

If a trust has two or more beneficiaries, the trustee has a duty to deal impartially with them and shall act impartially in investing and managing the trust property, taking into account any differing interests of the beneficiaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 63, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16004.

(a) The trustee has a duty not to use or deal with trust property for the trustee’s own profit or for any other purpose unconnected with the trust, nor to take part in any transaction in which the trustee has an interest adverse to the beneficiary.

(b) The trustee may not enforce any claim against the trust property that the trustee purchased after or in contemplation of appointment as trustee, but the court may allow the trustee to be reimbursed from trust property the amount that the trustee paid in good faith for the claim.

(c) A transaction between the trustee and a beneficiary which occurs during the existence of the trust or while the trustee’s influence with the beneficiary remains and by which the trustee obtains an advantage from the beneficiary is presumed to be a violation of the trustee’s fiduciary duties. This presumption is a presumption affecting the burden of proof. This subdivision does not apply to the provisions of an agreement between a trustee and a beneficiary relating to the hiring or compensation of the trustee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16004.5.

(a) A trustee may not require a beneficiary to relieve the trustee of liability as a condition for making a distribution or payment to, or for the benefit of, the beneficiary, if the distribution or payment is required by the trust instrument.

(b) This section may not be construed as affecting the trustee’s right to:

(1) Maintain a reserve for reasonably anticipated expenses, including, but not limited to, taxes, debts, trustee and accounting fees, and costs and expenses of administration.

(2) Seek a voluntary release or discharge of a trustee’s liability from the beneficiary.

(3) Require indemnification against a claim by a person or entity, other than a beneficiary referred to in subdivision (a), which may reasonably arise as a result of the distribution.

(4) Withhold any portion of an otherwise required distribution that is reasonably in dispute.

(5) Seek court or beneficiary approval of an accounting of trust activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

16005.

The trustee of one trust has a duty not to knowingly become a trustee of another trust adverse in its nature to the interest of the beneficiary of the first trust, and a duty to eliminate the conflict or resign as trustee when the conflict is discovered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16006.

The trustee has a duty to take reasonable steps under the circumstances to take and keep control of and to preserve the trust property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16007.

The trustee has a duty to make the trust property productive under the circumstances and in furtherance of the purposes of the trust.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16009.

The trustee has a duty to do the following:

(a) To keep the trust property separate from other property not subject to the trust.

(b) To see that the trust property is designated as property of the trust.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16010.

The trustee has a duty to take reasonable steps to enforce claims that are part of the trust property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16011.

The trustee has a duty to take reasonable steps to defend actions that may result in a loss to the trust.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16012.

(a) The trustee has a duty not to delegate to others the performance of acts that the trustee can reasonably be required personally to perform and may not transfer the office of trustee to another person nor delegate the entire administration of the trust to a cotrustee or other person.

(b) In a case where a trustee has properly delegated a matter to an agent, cotrustee, or other person, the trustee has a duty to exercise general supervision over the person performing the delegated matter.

(c) This section does not apply to investment and management functions under Section 16052.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 63, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16013.

If a trust has more than one trustee, each trustee has a duty to do the following:

(a) To participate in the administration of the trust.

(b) To take reasonable steps to prevent a cotrustee from committing a breach of trust or to compel a cotrustee to redress a breach of trust.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16014.

(a) The trustee has a duty to apply the full extent of the trustee’s skills.

(b) If the settlor, in selecting the trustee, has relied on the trustee’s representation of having special skills, the trustee is held to the standard of the skills represented.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16015.

The provision of services for compensation by a regulated financial institution or its affiliates in the ordinary course of business either to a trust of which it also acts as trustee or to a person dealing with the trust is not a violation of the duty provided in Section 16002 or 16004. For the purposes of this section, “affiliate” means a corporation that directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another domestic or foreign corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Trustee’s Standard of Care [16040. - 16042.]

16040.

(a) The trustee shall administer the trust with reasonable care, skill, and caution under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity would use in the conduct of an enterprise of like character and with like aims to accomplish the purposes of the trust as determined from the trust instrument.

(b) The settlor may expand or restrict the standard provided in subdivision (a) by express provisions in the trust instrument. A trustee is not liable to a beneficiary for the trustee’s good faith reliance on these express provisions.

(c) This section does not apply to investment and management functions governed by the Uniform Prudent Investor Act, Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 16045).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 63, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16041.

A trustee’s standard of care and performance in administering the trust is not affected by whether or not the trustee receives any compensation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16042.

(a) Notwithstanding the requirements of this article, Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 16045), and the terms of the trust, all trust funds that come within the custody of the public guardian who is appointed as trustee of the trust pursuant to Section 15660.5 may be deposited or invested in the same manner, and would be subject to the same terms and conditions, as a deposit or investment by the public administrator of funds in the estate of a decedent pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 7640) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 7.

(b) Upon the deposit or investment of trust property pursuant to subdivision (a), the public guardian shall be deemed to have met the standard of care specified in this article and Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 16045) with respect to this trust property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 93, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Uniform Prudent Investor Act [16045. - 16054.]

16045.

This article, together with subdivision (a) of Section 16002 and Section 16003, constitutes the prudent investor rule and may be cited as the Uniform Prudent Investor Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16046.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a trustee who invests and manages trust assets owes a duty to the beneficiaries of the trust to comply with the prudent investor rule.

(b) The settlor may expand or restrict the prudent investor rule by express provisions in the trust instrument. A trustee is not liable to a beneficiary for the trustee’s good faith reliance on these express provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16047.

(a) A trustee shall invest and manage trust assets as a prudent investor would, by considering the purposes, terms, distribution requirements, and other circumstances of the trust. In satisfying this standard, the trustee shall exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution.

(b) A trustee’s investment and management decisions respecting individual assets and courses of action must be evaluated not in isolation, but in the context of the trust portfolio as a whole and as a part of an overall investment strategy having risk and return objectives reasonably suited to the trust.

(c) Among circumstances that are appropriate to consider in investing and managing trust assets are the following, to the extent relevant to the trust or its beneficiaries:

(1) General economic conditions.

(2) The possible effect of inflation or deflation.

(3) The expected tax consequences of investment decisions or strategies.

(4) The role that each investment or course of action plays within the overall trust portfolio.

(5) The expected total return from income and the appreciation of capital.

(6) Other resources of the beneficiaries known to the trustee as determined from information provided by the beneficiaries.

(7) Needs for liquidity, regularity of income, and preservation or appreciation of capital.

(8) An asset’s special relationship or special value, if any, to the purposes of the trust or to one or more of the beneficiaries.

(d) A trustee shall make a reasonable effort to ascertain facts relevant to the investment and management of trust assets.

(e) A trustee may invest in any kind of property or type of investment or engage in any course of action or investment strategy consistent with the standards of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16048.

In making and implementing investment decisions, the trustee has a duty to diversify the investments of the trust unless, under the circumstances, it is prudent not to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16049.

Within a reasonable time after accepting a trusteeship or receiving trust assets, a trustee shall review the trust assets and make and implement decisions concerning the retention and disposition of assets, in order to bring the trust portfolio into compliance with the purposes, terms, distribution requirements, and other circumstances of the trust, and with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16050.

In investing and managing trust assets, a trustee may only incur costs that are appropriate and reasonable in relation to the assets, overall investment strategy, purposes, and other circumstances of the trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16051.

Compliance with the prudent investor rule is determined in light of the facts and circumstances existing at the time of a trustee’s decision or action and not by hindsight.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16052.

(a) A trustee may delegate investment and management functions as prudent under the circumstances. The trustee shall exercise prudence in the following:

(1) Selecting an agent.

(2) Establishing the scope and terms of the delegation, consistent with the purposes and terms of the trust.

(3) Periodically reviewing the agent’s overall performance and compliance with the terms of the delegation.

(b) In performing a delegated function, an agent has a duty to exercise reasonable care to comply with the terms of the delegation.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in Section 16401, a trustee who complies with the requirements of subdivision (a) is not liable to the beneficiaries or to the trust for the decisions or actions of the agent to whom the function was delegated.

(d) By accepting the delegation of a trust function from the trustee of a trust that is subject to the law of this state, an agent submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16053.

The following terms or comparable language in the provisions of a trust, unless otherwise limited or modified, authorizes any investment or strategy permitted under this chapter: “investments permissible by law for investment of trust funds,” “legal investments,” “authorized investments,” “using the judgment and care under the circumstances then prevailing that persons of prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs, not in regard to speculation but in regard to the permanent disposition of their funds, considering the probable income as well as the probable safety of their capital,” “prudent man rule,” “prudent trustee rule,” “prudent person rule,” and “prudent investor rule.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16054.

This article applies to trusts existing on and created after its effective date. As applied to trusts existing on its effective date, this article governs only decisions or actions occurring after that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 63, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Trustee’s Duty to Report Information and Account to Beneficiaries [16060. - 16069.]

16060.

The trustee has a duty to keep the beneficiaries of the trust reasonably informed of the trust and its administration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16060.5.

As used in this article, “terms of the trust” means the written trust instrument of an irrevocable trust or those provisions of a written trust instrument in effect at the settlor’s death that describe or affect that portion of a trust that has become irrevocable at the death of the settlor. In addition, “terms of the trust” includes, but is not limited to, signatures, amendments, disclaimers, and any directions or instructions to the trustee that affect the disposition of the trust. “Terms of the trust” does not include documents which were intended to affect disposition only while the trust was revocable. If a trust has been completely restated, “terms of the trust” does not include trust instruments or amendments which are superseded by the last restatement before the settlor’s death, but it does include amendments executed after the restatement. “Terms of the trust” also includes any document irrevocably exercising a power of appointment over the trust or over any portion of the trust which has become irrevocable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 34, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16060.7.

On the request of a beneficiary, the trustee shall provide the terms of the trust to the beneficiary unless the trustee is not required to provide the terms of the trust to the beneficiary in accordance with Section 16069.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 621, Sec. 2.   (SB 202)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

16061.

Except as provided in Section 16069, on reasonable request by a beneficiary, the trustee shall report to the beneficiary by providing requested information to the beneficiary relating to the administration of the trust relevant to the beneficiary’s interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 621, Sec. 3.   (SB 202)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

16061.5.

(a) A trustee shall provide a true and complete copy of the terms of the irrevocable trust, or irrevocable portion of the trust, to each of the following:

(1) Any beneficiary of the trust who requests it, and to any heir of a deceased settlor who requests it, when a revocable trust or any portion of a revocable trust becomes irrevocable because of the death of one or more of the settlors of the trust, when a power of appointment is effective or lapses upon the death of a settlor under the circumstances described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 16061.7, or because, by the express terms of the trust, the trust becomes irrevocable within one year of the death of a
 settlor because of a contingency related to the death of one or more of the settlors of the trust.

(2) Any beneficiary of the trust who requests it, whenever there is a change of trustee of an irrevocable trust.

(3) If the trust is a charitable trust subject to the supervision of the Attorney General, to the Attorney General, if requested, when a revocable trust or any portion of a revocable trust becomes irrevocable because of the death of one or more of the settlors of the trust, when a power of appointment is effective or lapses upon the death of a settlor under the circumstances described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 16061.7, or because, by the express terms of the trust, the trust becomes irrevocable within one year of the death of a settlor because of a contingency related to the death of one or more of the settlors of the trust, and whenever there is a
 change of trustee of an irrevocable trust.

(b) The trustee shall, for purposes of this section, rely upon any final judicial determination of heirship. However, the trustee shall have discretion to make a good faith determination by any reasonable means of the heirs of a deceased settlor in the absence of a final judicial determination of heirship known to the trustee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 621, Sec. 4.   (SB 202)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

16061.7.

(a) A trustee shall serve a notification by the trustee as described in this section in the following events:

(1) When a revocable trust or any portion thereof becomes irrevocable because of the death of one or more of the settlors of the trust, or because, by the express terms of the trust, the trust becomes irrevocable within one year of the death of a settlor because of a contingency related to the death of one or more of the settlors of the trust.

(2) Whenever there is a change of trustee of an irrevocable trust.

(3) Whenever a power of appointment retained by a
 settlor is effective or lapses upon death of the settlor with respect to an inter vivos trust which was, or was purported to be, irrevocable upon its creation. This paragraph shall not apply to a charitable remainder trust. For purposes of this paragraph, “charitable remainder trust” means a charitable remainder annuity trust or charitable remainder unitrust as defined in Section 664(d) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) The duty to serve the notification by the trustee pursuant to this subdivision is the duty of the continuing or successor trustee, and any one cotrustee may serve the notification.

(b) The notification by the trustee required by subdivision (a) shall be served on each of the following:

(1) Each
 beneficiary of the irrevocable trust or irrevocable portion of the trust, subject to the limitations of Section 15804.

(2) Each heir of the deceased settlor, if the event that requires notification is the death of a settlor or irrevocability within one year of the death of the settlor of the trust by the express terms of the trust because of a contingency related to the death of a settlor.

(3) If the trust is a charitable trust subject to the supervision of the Attorney General, to the Attorney General.

(c) A trustee shall, for purposes of this section, rely upon any final judicial determination of heirship, known to the trustee, but the trustee shall have discretion to make a good faith determination by any reasonable means of
 the heirs of a deceased settlor in the absence of a final judicial determination of heirship known to the trustee.

(d) The trustee need not provide a copy of the notification by trustee to any beneficiary or heir (1) known to the trustee but who cannot be located by the trustee after reasonable diligence or (2) unknown to the trustee.

(e) The notification by trustee shall be served by any of the methods described in Section 1215 to the last known address.

(f) The notification by trustee shall be served not later than 60 days following the occurrence of the event requiring service of the notification by trustee, or 60 days after the trustee became aware of the existence of a person entitled to receive notification by trustee,
 if that person was not known to the trustee on the occurrence of the event requiring service of the notification. If there is a vacancy in the office of the trustee on the date of the occurrence of the event requiring service of the notification by trustee, or if that event causes a vacancy, then the 60-day period for service of the notification by trustee commences on the date the new trustee commences to serve as trustee.

(g) The notification by trustee shall contain the following information:

(1) The identity of the settlor or settlors of the trust and the date of execution of the trust instrument.

(2) The name, address, and telephone number of each trustee of the trust.

(3) The address of the physical location where the principal place of administration of the trust is located, pursuant to Section 17002.

(4) Any additional information that may be expressly required by the terms of the trust instrument.

(5) A notification that the recipient is entitled, upon reasonable request to the trustee, to receive from the trustee a true and complete copy of the terms of the trust.

(h) If the notification by the trustee is served because a revocable trust or any portion of it has become irrevocable because of the death of one or more settlors of the trust, or because, by the express terms of the trust, the trust becomes irrevocable within one year of the death of a settlor because of a
 contingency related to the death of one or more of the settlors of the trust, the notification by the trustee shall also include a warning, set out in a separate paragraph in not less than 10-point boldface type, or a reasonable equivalent thereof, that states as follows:

“You may not bring an action to contest the trust more than 120 days from the date this notification by the trustee is served upon you or 60 days from the date on which a copy of the terms of the trust is delivered to you during that 120-day period, whichever is later.”

(i) Any waiver by a settlor of the requirement of serving the notification by trustee required by this section is against public policy and shall be void.

(j) A trustee may serve a notification by
 trustee in the form required by this section on any person in addition to those on whom the notification by trustee is required to be served. A trustee is not liable to any person for serving or for not serving the notice on any person in addition to those on whom the notice is required to be served. A trustee is not required to serve a notification by trustee if the event that otherwise requires service of the notification by trustee occurs before January 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 87.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16061.8.

A person upon whom the notification by the trustee is served pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 16061.7, whether the notice is served on the person within or after the time period set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 16061.7,
 shall not
 bring an action to contest the trust more than 120 days from the date the notification by the trustee is served upon the person, or 60 days from the date on which a copy of the terms of the trust is delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to the person during that 120-day period, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 30, Sec. 1.   (AB 1745)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16061.9.

(a) A trustee who fails to serve the notification by trustee as required by Section 16061.7 on a beneficiary shall be responsible for all damages, attorney’s fees, and costs caused by the failure unless the trustee makes a reasonably diligent effort to comply with that section.

(b) A trustee who fails to serve the notification by trustee as required by Section 16061.7 on an heir who is not a beneficiary and whose identity is known to the trustee shall be responsible for all damages caused to the heir by the failure unless the trustee shows that the trustee made a reasonably diligent effort to comply with that section. For purposes of this
 subdivision, “reasonably diligent effort” means that the trustee has delivered notice pursuant to Section 1215 to the heir at the heir’s last address actually known to the trustee.

(c) A trustee, in exercising discretion with respect to the timing and nature of distributions of trust assets, may consider the fact that the period in which a beneficiary or heir could bring an action to contest the trust has not expired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 89.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16062.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section and in Section 16064, the trustee shall account at least annually, at the termination of the trust, and upon a change of trustee, to each beneficiary to whom income or principal is required or authorized in the trustee’s discretion to be currently distributed.

(b) A trustee of a living trust created by an instrument executed before July 1, 1987, is not subject to the duty to account provided by subdivision (a).

(c) A trustee of a trust created by a will executed before July 1, 1987, is not subject to the duty to account provided by subdivision (a), except that if the trust is removed from continuing court jurisdiction pursuant to Article 2 (commencing
 with Section 17350) of Chapter 4 of Part 5, the duty to account provided by subdivision (a) applies to the trustee.

(d) Except as provided in Section 16064, the duty of a trustee to account pursuant to former Section 1120.1a of the Probate Code (as repealed by Chapter 820 of the Statutes of 1986), under a trust created by a will executed before July 1, 1977, which has been removed from continuing court jurisdiction pursuant to former Section 1120.1a, continues to apply after July 1, 1987. The duty to account under former Section 1120.1a may be satisfied by furnishing an account that satisfies the requirements of Section 16063.

(e) Any limitation or waiver in a trust instrument of the obligation to account is against public policy and shall be void as to any sole trustee who is either of the following:

(1) A
 disqualified person as defined in former Section 21350.5 (as repealed by Chapter 620 of the Statutes of 2010).

(2) Described in subdivision (a) of Section 21380, but not described in Section 21382.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 250.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

16063.

(a) An account furnished pursuant to Section 16062 shall contain the following information:

(1) A statement of receipts and disbursements of principal and income that have occurred during the last complete fiscal year of the trust or since the last account.

(2) A statement of the assets and liabilities of the trust as of the end of the last complete fiscal year of the trust or as of the end of the period covered by the account.

(3) The trustee’s compensation for the last complete fiscal year of the trust or since the last account.

(4) The agents hired by the trustee, their relationship to the trustee, if any, and their compensation, for the last complete fiscal year of the trust or since the last account.

(5) A statement that the recipient of the account may petition the court pursuant to Section 17200 to obtain a court review of the account and of the acts of the trustee.

(6) A statement that claims against the trustee for breach of trust may not be made after the expiration of three years from the date the beneficiary receives an account or report disclosing facts giving rise to the claim.

(b) All accounts filed to be approved by a court shall be presented in the manner provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1060) of Part 1 of Division 3.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 724, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16064.

The trustee is not required to account to a beneficiary as described in subdivision (a) of Section 16062, in any of the following circumstances:

(a) To the extent the trust instrument waives the account, except that no waiver described in subdivision (e) of Section 16062 shall be valid or enforceable. Regardless of a waiver of accounting in the trust instrument, upon a showing that it is reasonably likely that a material breach of the trust has occurred, the court may compel the trustee to account.

(b) As to a beneficiary who has waived in writing the right to an account. A waiver of rights under this subdivision may be withdrawn in writing
 at any time as to accounts for transactions occurring after the date of the written withdrawal. Regardless of a waiver of accounting by a beneficiary, upon a showing that is reasonably likely that a material breach of the trust has occurred, the court may compel the trustee to account.

(c) In any of the circumstances set forth in Section 16069.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 621, Sec. 7.   (SB 202)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

16068.

Any waiver by a settlor of the obligation of the trustee of either of the following is against public policy and shall be void:

(a) To provide the terms of the trust to the beneficiary as required by Sections 16060.7 and 16061.5.

(b) To provide requested information to the beneficiary as required by Section 16061.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 621, Sec. 8.   (SB 202)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

16069.

(a) The trustee is not required to account to the beneficiary, provide the terms of the trust to a beneficiary, or provide requested information to the beneficiary pursuant to Section 16061, in any of the following circumstances:

(1) In the case of a beneficiary of a revocable trust, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 15800, for the period when the trust may be revoked.

(2) If the beneficiary and the trustee are the same person.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in the case of a revocable trust, if no person holding the power to revoke the trust, in whole or in part, is competent, the trustee’s duties to account shall be owed to those beneficiaries specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 15800.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 749, Sec. 2.   (AB 1079)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Duties With Regard to Discretionary Powers [16080. - 16082.]

16080.

Except as provided in Section 16081, a discretionary power conferred upon a trustee is not left to the trustee’s arbitrary discretion, but shall be exercised reasonably.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16081.

(a) Subject to the additional requirements of subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), if a trust instrument confers “absolute,” “sole,” or “uncontrolled” discretion on a trustee, the trustee shall act in accordance with fiduciary principles and shall not act in bad faith or in disregard of the purposes of the trust.

(b) Notwithstanding the use of terms like “absolute,” “sole,” or “uncontrolled” by a settlor or a testator, a person who is a beneficiary of a trust that permits the person, either individually or as trustee or cotrustee, to make discretionary distributions of income or principal to or for the benefit of himself or herself pursuant to a standard, shall exercise that power reasonably and in accordance with the standard.
